Utah statutes.
61-2f-304.   Termination of associate broker or sales agent by principal
broker -- Notice.
(1)  If a principal broker terminates an associate broker or sales agent, the
principal broker shall by no later than three days from the day on which the
principal broker terminates the associate broker or sales agent:
(a)  provide the division a signed statement notifying the division of the
termination; and
(b)  send to the last-known residence address of that associate broker or
sales agent notice that the principal broker has notified the division of the
termination of the associate broker or sales agent.
(2)  An associate broker or sales agent may not perform any act under this
chapter, directly or indirectly, from and after the date of receipt of the
termination notice by the division until the day on which the associate broker
or sales agent is affiliated with a principal broker.
